Maryland, session 2025, HB0140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Agriculture
8–306.
(a) A soil conservation district constitutes a political subdivision of the State, and
a public body corporate and politic, exercising public powers.
(b) The supervisors may:
(1) Conduct surveys, investigations, and research relating to the character
of soil erosion and the preventive and control measures needed and publish the results, if
the research program is executed in cooperation with the State, the United States, or any
of their agencies;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0140*

HOUSE BILL 140
(2) Disseminate information concerning preventive and control measures;
(3) Conduct demonstration projects within the district on State owned or
controlled land, with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction
of them, or on any land within the district upon obtaining the consent of the land occupier
or the possessor of the necessary rights or interests in the land, in order to demonstrate by
example the means, methods, and measures for conserving soil and soil resources, and
preventing and controlling soil erosion in the form of soil blowing and washing;
(4) Carry out preventive and control measures within the district including
engineering operations, cultivation methods, the growing of vegetation, changes in land
use, and the measures listed in § 8–102(c) of this title, on State owned or controlled land,
with the cooperation of the agency administering and having jurisdiction of them, or on any
other land within the district upon obtaining the consent of the land occupier or the
possessor of the necessary rights or interests in the land;
(5) Cooperate or enter into agreements with any person to furnish financial
or other aid to any government or private agency or any land occupier within the district,
in carrying on erosion control and prevention operations within the district, subject to
conditions the supervisors deem necessary to advance the purposes of this subtitle;
(6) Obtain options upon and to acquire, by purchase, exchange, lease, gift,
grant, or otherwise, any real or personal property or rights or interests in it, which shall be
exempt from State, county, or municipal taxation;
(7) Maintain, administer, and improve any acquired properties, receive
income from the properties and expend the income to carry out the purposes and provisions
of this subtitle;
(8) Sell, lease, or otherwise dispose of its property or interests in it to
further the purposes and the provisions of this subtitle;
(9) Make available to land occupiers within the district, on terms the
supervisors prescribe, agricultural and engineering machinery and equipment, fertilizer,
seeds, seedlings, and other material or equipment, to assist land occupiers in conserving
soil resources and preventing and controlling soil erosion;
(10) Construct, improve, and maintain structures necessary or convenient
for the performance of any of the operations authorized in this title;
(11) Develop comprehensive plans for conserving soil resources and
controlling and preventing soil erosion within the district, if the plans specify in reasonable
detail, the acts, procedures, performances, and avoidances which are necessary or desirable
for the effectuation of the plans, including the specification of engineering operations,
cultivation methods, the growing of vegetation, cropping programs, tillage practices, and
changes in land use;

HOUSE BILL 140 3
(12) Publish the plans and information and bring them to the attention of
land occupiers within the district;
(13) Take over, by purchase, lease, or otherwise, and administer any soil
conservation, erosion control, or erosion prevention project located within the district
undertaken by the United States, the State, or any of their agencies;
(14) Act as agent for the United States, the State, or any of their agencies,
in connection with the acquisition, construction, operation, or administration of any soil
conservation, erosion control, or erosion prevention project within its boundaries;
(15) Accept gifts in money, services, materials, or otherwise from the United
States, the State, or any of their agencies and to use or expend them to carry out the
operations of the districts;
(16) Borrow money on its negotiable paper to carry out its powers and
duties;
(17) Approve or disapprove plans for clearing, grading, transporting, or
otherwise distributing soil in accordance with § 4–105(a) of the Environment Article and
adopt general criteria and specific written recommendations concerning the control of
erosion and siltation of pollution associated with these activities;
(18) In accordance with subsection (c) of this section:
(i) Recommend a fee system to cover the cost of reviewing grading
and sediment control plans; and
(ii) Recommend a fee system to cover the cost of reviewing small
pond plans;
(19) Establish and implement a fee system to cover the cost of inspecting
sites with approved sediment control plans pursuant to a contractual agreement with the
Department of the Environment under § 4–103(f) of the Environment Article;
(20) (i) Sue and be sued in the name of the district;
(ii) Have a seal which shall be judicially noticed;
(iii) Have perpetual succession unless terminated;
(iv) Make and execute contracts and other instruments necessary or
convenient to the exercise of its powers; and
(v) Adopt, amend, and repeal, rules and regulations not inconsistent
with this title, to effectuate its purposes and powers;

HOUSE BILL 140
(21) (i) Provide contracting services, equipment, and supplies to
landowners;
(ii) Establish prices for the sale of the contracting services,
equipment, and supplies; and
(iii) Promulgate any rule or regulation necessary to implement this
item; and
(22) In addition to the powers enumerated in this title, displace or limit
economic competition in the exercise of any power specified in this title; provided that the
powers granted to a district pursuant to this paragraph shall not be construed:
(i) To grant to the district powers in any substantive area not
otherwise granted to the district by other public general or public local law;
(ii) To restrict the district from exercising any power granted to the
district by other public general or public local law or otherwise;
(iii) To authorize the district or its officers to engage in any activity
which is beyond their power under other public general law, public local law, or otherwise;
or
(iv) To preempt or supersede the regulatory authority of any State
department or agency under any public general law.
(c) (1) Subject to § 8–311 of this subtitle, a fee system recommended under
subsection (b)(18) of this section shall take effect on enactment by the local governing body.
(2) Any fees collected under a fee system established in accordance with
this subsection shall be supplemental to county and State funds and may not:
(i) Be used to reduce county or State funds; or
(ii) As applicable, exceed the cost of reviewing:
1. Grading and sediment control plans; or
2. Small pond plans.
(d) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the supervisor shall
maintain information from a soil conservation and water quality plan in a manner that
protects the identity of the person for whom the plan is prepared.
(2) The supervisor shall make a soil conservation and water quality plan
available to:

HOUSE BILL 140 5
(i) The Department of the Environment for enforcement action
under § 4–413 of the Environment Article; and
(ii) The Department, [which may use the information for statistical
purposes] FOR:
1. ENFORCEMENT ACTION UNDER SUBTITLE 8 OF THIS
TITLE; AND
2. STATISTICAL PURPOSES.
(3) The Department shall:
(i) Maintain the information in the manner that protects the
identity of the person for whom the plan is prepared; and
(ii) Make any information from a plan available to the Department
of the Environment to support the development of a compliance or enforcement case for
purposes of addressing an existing water quality problem in accordance with procedures
established between the departments and the State Soil Conservation Committee.
(e) As a condition to extending any benefit of this title to any land not owned or
controlled by the State or any of its agencies, or to performing work on them, the
supervisors may require contributions in money, services, materials, or otherwise to any
operations conferring benefits, and may require the land occupier to enter into and perform
agreements or covenants concerning the permanent use of the land as tends to prevent or
control erosion.
(f) The supervisors of two or more districts may cooperate with one another in
the exercise of any powers conferred by this title.
(g) No provision relating to acquisition, operation, or disposition of property by
other public bodies is applicable to a district, unless the provision specifically so states.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.